Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 4 Membership in the Retirement System
47-3-67.
Membership of teachers who are employed by certain county school systems; transfer from local retirement fund; creditable service; contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Continuous service” means active continuous employment in the county school system interrupted only by a leave duly authorized and granted by the county school system.

“County” means any county of this state having a population of 550,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census.

“County school system” means the local school system of a county.

“Local retirement fund” means a local retirement fund covering teachers employed by a county school system.

“Teacher” means any teacher as defined by paragraph (28) of Code Section 47-3-1 who is employed by a county school system.

“Transferred teacher” means a teacher who is transferred from membership in a local retirement fund to membership in the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia by subsection (c) of this Code section.

Any teacher who becomes employed by a county school system on or after July 1, 1988, shall become a member of the retirement system as a condition of employment, and such teacher shall not be eligible for membership in a local retirement fund.

Effective on July 1, 1988, all teachers who are actively employed by a county school system on that date and who were so employed prior to that date and who are enrolled on that date under the local retirement fund in a retirement plan with an effective date on or after April 1, 1962, shall be transferred to and become members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia and, subject to the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section, shall cease to be members of the local retirement fund, except that any such teacher who has previously retired from the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia shall be excluded from such transfer. Each such transferred teacher shall receive creditable service under the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia equivalent to the creditable service the teacher had under the local retirement fund as of July 1, 1988, provided that creditable service shall not be granted for service which would not be allowable as creditable service under the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia.

If the benefit which becomes payable to a transferred teacher upon the teacher’s retirement or to another beneficiary of a transferred teacher is less under this retirement system than it would have been under the local retirement fund had membership in the local retirement fund continued, then the fiscal authority or other governing body, by whatever name designated, of the local retirement fund shall pay to the retired transferred teacher or to the other beneficiary of such a teacher an additional benefit equal to the amount by which the benefit which would be payable under the local retirement fund exceeds the benefit which becomes payable under this retirement system, with the benefit under this retirement system being computed for purposes of this Code section as if the teacher had retired with a retirement allowance determined under Code Section 47-3-120. The calculation of the additional benefit, if any, which is to be paid by the local retirement fund under this subsection shall be based on the rights that a transferred teacher had under the local retirement fund on June 30, 1988, plus rights which would have accrued under the local retirement fund after that date only for continuous service as a teacher in the employ of the county school system; provided, however, that any change made in the local retirement fund after that date shall not be considered in the determination of such rights; provided, further, that any amendment to any such local retirement fund made after June 30, 1988, which provides for the calculation of benefits on a nine-month basis, provides for optional spouses’ benefits, or provides for the continuation of spouses’ benefits after remarriage shall be considered in the determination of such rights. The benefits payable under this subsection shall be made only if the transferred teacher shall have timely paid to the local retirement fund all amounts which such teacher would have paid to such fund, had he or she continued to be a member of such fund, less such amounts as were actually paid to the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia by or on behalf of such teacher.

(d.1)

Until such time as the rate of employee contribution required of all members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia shall be increased, no transferred teacher who remains in the employ of the county school system shall be required to pay any greater percentage of the teacher’s salary to the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia than such transferred teacher would have been required to pay to the local retirement fund had such teacher remained a member of the local retirement fund. In the event that a contribution in excess of such amount shall be required by the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, such excess contribution shall be made by the county school system; provided, however, that any increase in the rate of employee contribution required of all members of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia after July 1, 1988, shall be paid for by the transferred teacher.

For each transferred teacher, the fiscal authority or other governing body, by whatever name designated, of the local retirement fund shall pay to the board of trustees the amount of employee contributions which would have been paid by the teacher to the retirement system had the teacher been a member of the retirement system during the period of creditable service established pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section, plus applicable accrued regular interest thereon, as determined by the board of trustees, to the date of payment.

The board of trustees shall make the determination of the amount to be paid to the board under paragraph (1) of this subsection and the fiscal authority or other governing body, by whatever name designated, of the local retirement fund shall pay the amount so determined to the board of trustees by not later than August 1, 1988.

The board of trustees shall keep appropriate records to identify the funds paid into the pension accumulation fund pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection. In the event a transferred teacher ceases to be a member of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia and withdraws accumulated contributions pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 47-3-128, the board of trustees shall refund to the county school system an amount equal to the funds paid into the pension accumulation fund pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection plus regular interest on that amount.

(e.1) (1)

Any excess employee contributions paid to the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia pursuant to the provisions of subsection (d.1) of this Code section shall be paid into the pension accumulation fund and shall not constitute “accumulated contributions” within the meaning of paragraph (1) of Code Section 47-3-1 or for the purposes of Code Section 47-3-128.

(e.2) (1)

If a transferred teacher who has maintained continuous service with the county school system or a beneficiary of such a transferred teacher does not qualify to receive a monthly benefit under this retirement system but would be qualified to receive a monthly benefit under the local retirement fund if the transferred teacher’s membership in the local retirement fund had continued, such transferred teacher or the beneficiary of such transferred teacher may elect to receive a monthly benefit under the provisions of subsection (d) of this Code section. If such transferred teacher or a beneficiary of such transferred teacher thereafter qualifies to receive a monthly benefit under this retirement system, the amount payable to the transferred teacher or beneficiary under subsection (d) of this Code section shall be reduced accordingly.

Any full-time public school lunchroom managers or supervisors, full-time public school maintenance managers or supervisors, full-time public school transportation managers or supervisors, or full-time public school warehouse managers or supervisors who become members of this retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section or Code Section 47-3-66 shall have the right to obtain creditable service under this retirement system pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 47-3-63 on the same basis that other members of this retirement system who are subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-3-63 obtain creditable service.

(2)

From the funds paid to the board of trustees pursuant to the provisions of subsection (e) of this Code section, that portion thereof representing employee contributions paid to the local retirement fund by the transferred teacher shall be paid into the annuity savings fund and shall constitute “accumulated contributions” within the meaning of paragraph (1) of Code Section 47-3-1 and for the purposes of Code Section 47-3-128; and the remaining portion shall be paid into the pension accumulation fund and shall have the same status as excess employee contributions described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

(2)

A transferred teacher or a beneficiary of a transferred teacher who makes the election provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not be entitled to a refund of the accumulated contributions which have been credited to the transferred teacher’s account at the time of said election. If such a transferred teacher subsequently returns to active service, this paragraph shall not apply to accumulated contributions credited to the transferred teacher’s account after returning to active service.

(3)

If a transferred teacher who makes the election provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection does not at any time thereafter qualify to receive a monthly benefit under this retirement system and if no beneficiary of the transferred teacher is qualified to receive a monthly benefit under this retirement system upon the death of the transferred teacher, then upon the death of such transferred teacher, the board of trustees shall pay to the county school system an amount equal to the accumulated contributions of the deceased transferred teacher and an amount equal to the funds paid into the pension accumulation fund pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (e.1) of this Code section, plus regular interest on that amount. The board of trustees shall maintain such records as may be necessary to comply with the provisions of this paragraph.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-67

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 1837, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 314, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 518, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 1996, p. 727, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 45/SB 436.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Office of the State Treasurer” for “Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” six times in subsection (j). The second 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, deleted former subsections (f) through (l) and redesignated former subsection (m) as present subsection (f). See the Code Commission note regarding the effect of these amendments.

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 45.
See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921); Keener v. McDougall,

232 Ga. 273

(1974).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-3-68.
Membership of eligible university system employees.

The provisions of this paragraph shall apply to persons employed prior to July 1, 2008. As used in this Code section, the term “eligible university system employee” means faculty and principal administrators employed by the University System of Georgia, as designated by regulations of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, who are:

Employed on or after July 1, 1990, and are eligible for membership in the retirement system provided for in this chapter as of the date of employment; or

Members of the retirement system provided for in this chapter on July 1, 1990, with less than ten years of creditable service on that date.

The provisions of this paragraph shall apply to persons first or again employed on or after July 1, 2008. As used in this Code section, the term “eligible university system employee” means faculty members or exempt employees within the meaning of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended, 29 U.S.C. Section 201, et seq., who are eligible for membership in the retirement system provided for in this chapter as of the date of such employment.

Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any eligible university system employee may withdraw from or decline membership in the retirement system provided for in this chapter and participate in the optional retirement plan provided for in Chapter 21 of this title as provided in this Code section.

Members of the retirement system provided for in this chapter who were eligible university system employees on July 1, 1990, shall have the option to withdraw from this retirement system and participate in the optional retirement plan provided for in Chapter 21 of this title. Members exercising said option, which shall be irrevocable, shall forfeit all rights under this retirement system except that they shall have the right to have their accumulated contributions under this retirement system transferred to the optional retirement plan. Upon such election’s becoming effective, the board of trustees shall transfer the member’s accumulated contributions directly to the optional retirement plan to purchase benefits thereunder and the funds so transferred will not be made available to the member except as a participant in the optional retirement plan. The option provided for in this Code section shall be exercised by filing a written notification thereof with the board of trustees and with the employer by not later than July 31, 1991. The effective date of the option and transfer for each member who elects to become a new participant in the optional retirement plan shall be August 1, 1991. The failure to exercise the option by July 31, 1991, shall be an irrevocable election to remain a member of this retirement system.

Eligible university system employees employed on or after July 1, 1990, shall, within 30 days immediately following the effective date of their employment, make an irrevocable decision to be a member of this retirement system or participate in the optional retirement plan provided for in Chapter 21 of this title; provided, however, that such employees employed on or after July 1, 1995, shall make such irrevocable decision within 60 days immediately following the effective date of their employment. A written statement of the decision shall be filed with the employer and with the board of trustees and shall be effective from the date of employment. If an eligible university system employee fails to file a statement of decision provided for in this subsection, such failure shall be an irrevocable election to become a member of the retirement system provided for in this chapter.

Any former member of this retirement system who is presently a participant in the optional retirement plan provided for in Chapter 21 of this title shall have the right to have the former member’s accumulated contributions to this retirement system transferred to said optional retirement plan. Such right shall be exercised by filing a written notification thereof with the board of trustees by not later than July 31, 1991. After receiving such notification, the board of trustees shall, by not later than October 1, 1991, transfer the former member’s accumulated contributions directly to the optional retirement plan to purchase benefits thereunder and the funds so transferred will not be made available to the former member except as a participant in the optional retirement plan.

Any member of this retirement system who was employed on July 1, 2004, as an assistant coach by the athletic department of a state university may make an irrevocable decision to participate in the optional retirement plan provided by Chapter 21 of this title. Such election shall be made to the employer and the board of trustees not later than August 31, 2004. The board of trustees shall transfer to such member’s account in such optional retirement plan all employer and employee contributions made by or on behalf of such member together with regular interest thereon.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-68

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1811, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 614, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 334, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 448, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 347, § 1/HB 815.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in subsection (a), designated the existing provisions as paragraph (a)(1); in paragraph (a)(1), added the first sentence; redesignated former paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(2) as present subparagraphs (a)(1)(A) and (a)(1)(B), respectively; and added paragraph (a)(2).